Vermont, session 2025-2026, S235.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 9 V.S.A. chapter 63, subchapter 13 is added to read:
Subchapter 13. Motor Vehicle Service History
§ 2495. DEFINITIONS
As used in this section:
(1) “Dealer” means a person engaged in the business of selling or
exchanging new or used motor vehicles, or both. A dealer includes any person
VT LEG #385981 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.235
2026 Page 2 of 4
that, as part of or incidental to such business, repairs motor vehicles, sells
motor vehicle parts and accessories, or leases or rents motor vehicles.
(2) “Repair shop” means a person that is engaged in the business of
performing service or maintenance on motor vehicles but is not a dealer.
(3) “Vehicle history database” means a database from which a person
may obtain vehicle history information specific to a vehicle identification
number (VIN).
(4) “Vehicle history information” includes the following related to a
motor vehicle:
(A) accident or damage information;
(B) the number of previous owners;
(C) information regarding service or maintenance history, including
diagnostic information generated while performing service or maintenance;
(D) odometer reading; and
(E) title information.
(5) “Vehicle history report” means any written or electronic
communication of vehicle history information made by a vehicle history report
provider that is made available to consumers.
(6) “Vehicle history report provider” means an entity that generates
vehicle history reports from a vehicle history database that are provided
directly to consumers. “Vehicle history report provider” does not include a
VT LEG #385981 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.235
2026 Page 3 of 4
dealer that obtains a vehicle history report from a third party that is not an
affiliate of the dealer and that then communicates the vehicle history report
without altering the vehicle history information in the report.
§ 2495a. REPORTS TO VEHICLE HISTORY REPORT PROVIDERS
In any instance in which a dealer or repair shop provides information
regarding a motor vehicle to a vehicle history report provider or other entity
that maintains a vehicle history database, the dealer or repair shop shall
provide accurate information regarding the motor vehicle, including any
repairs, services, or maintenance performed on the vehicle and the results of
any diagnostics performed on the vehicle.
§ 2495b. DISCLOSURE OF USED VEHICLE HISTORY INFORMATION
TO PROSPECTIVE PURCHASERS
A dealer shall disclose to a prospective purchaser of a used motor vehicle
any vehicle history information related to that motor vehicle that is in the
possession of the dealer, including any vehicle history reports that the dealer
has obtained and any other vehicle history information that is in the possession
of the dealer or is readily available to the dealer.
§ 2495c. VIOLATIONS
(a) A violation of this subchapter is deemed to be a violation of section
2453 of this title.
VT LEG #385981 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.235
2026 Page 4 of 4
(b) The Attorney General has the same authority to make rules, conduct
civil investigations, enter into assurances of discontinuance, and bring civil
actions, and private parties have the save rights and remedies, as provided
pursuant to subchapter 1 of this chapter.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385981 v.1